public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/ved.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX b ver ímoi/M aver
SFX b ver íu/Q aver
SFX b ver ƚo/B aver
SFX b ver biàndoge aver
SFX b ver biàndome/G aver
SFX b ver biè aver
SFX b ver bié aver
SFX b ver bi aver
SFX b ver bia aver
SFX b ver biando aver
SFX b ver bie aver
SFX b ver biede aver
SFX b ver biege aver
SFX b ver biemo aver
SFX b ver bien aver
SFX b ver biene aver
SFX b ver bion aver
SFX b ver bione aver
SFX b ver emo/L aver
SFX b ver en/L aver
SFX b ver ene aver
SFX b ver eni/M aver
SFX b ver ense aver
SFX b ver ié/P aver
SFX b ver iede/P aver
SFX b ver iege/P aver
SFX b ver imo/L aver
SFX b ver ion/L [^cijɉñ]aver
SFX b ver on/L [cijɉñ]aver
SFX b ver ione [^cijɉñ]aver
SFX b ver one [cijɉñ]aver
SFX b ver ioni/M [^cijɉñ]aver
SFX b ver oni/M [cijɉñ]aver
SFX b ver ionse [^cijɉñ]aver
SFX b ver onse [cijɉñ]aver
SFX b ver isen/L aver
SFX b ver isene aver
SFX b ver iseni/M aver
SFX b ver isense aver
SFX b ver isié/P aver
SFX b ver isiede/P aver
SFX b ver isiege/P aver
SFX b ver ision/L aver
SFX b ver isione aver
SFX b ver isioni/M aver
SFX b ver isionse aver
SFX b ver ison/L aver
SFX b ver isone aver
SFX b ver isoni/M aver
SFX b ver isonse aver
SFX b ver lo/B aver
SFX b ver mi/K aver
SFX b ver piè aver
SFX b ver pié aver
SFX b ver pi aver
SFX b ver pia aver
SFX b ver pie aver
SFX b ver piede aver
SFX b ver piege aver
SFX b ver piemo aver
SFX b ver pien aver
SFX b ver piene aver
SFX b ver pion aver
SFX b ver pione aver
SFX b ver tu/O aver
